src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/myv-test-V-kundams_all_gt-norm.yaml
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундындерявлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундындерявлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундындерявлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундындерявлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg1+Foc/Add: кундындерявлимизьгак
     кундамс+V+Der/Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1+Foc/Add: кундындерявлимизьгак
